Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1071
Injunctions not granted; when.

No injunction shall be granted by a judge, after a motion therefor has been overruled on the merits of the application by this court; and where it has been refused by the court in which the action is brought, or a judge thereof, it shall not be granted to the same applicant by a court of inferior jurisdiction or any judge thereof.

R.S.1867, Code § 259, p. 436;

R.S.1913, § 7800;

C.S.1922, § 8744;

C.S.1929, § 20-1071;

R.S.1943, § 25-1071.